Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2511
Incentive payments for street purposes; priority.

Before distributing the February portion of funds under sections 39-2518 and 66-4,148, incentive payments shall first be made as provided in sections 39-2512 to 39-2515.

Laws 1969, c. 316, § 1, p. 1139;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 45;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 17.